Hawaii statutes.
§431:19-204 Certificate of authority.
(a) Any special purpose financial captive insurance company, when permitted by
its organizational documents, may apply to the commissioner for a certificate
of authority to transact insurance or reinsurance business as authorized in
this part. A special purpose financial captive insurance company may only
insure or reinsure the risks of its counterparty. Notwithstanding any other
provision of this part, a special purpose financial captive insurance company
may purchase reinsurance to cede the risks assumed under the special purpose
financial captive insurance contracts, subject to the prior approval of the
commissioner.

(b) In conjunction with the issuance of a
certificate of authority to a special purpose financial captive insurance
company, the commissioner may issue an order that includes any provisions,
terms, and conditions regarding the organization, licensing, and operation of
the special purpose financial captive insurance company that are deemed appropriate
by the commissioner and that are not inconsistent with this part. Except as
provided in sections 431:19-212 and 431:19-213, a certificate of authority
issued to a special purpose financial captive insurance company pursuant to
this part shall not be revoked, suspended, amended, or modified other than as
follows:

(1) The special purpose financial captive insurance
company consents to the revocation, suspension, amendment, or modification; or

(2) The commissioner makes a showing of clear and
convincing evidence demonstrating that the revocation, suspension, amendment,
or modification is necessary to avoid irreparable harm to the special purpose
financial captive insurance company, investors who hold special purpose
financial captive insurance company securities, the public, or a counterparty,
if applicable.

(c) To qualify for a certificate of authority,
a special purpose financial captive insurance company shall be subject, in
addition to the requirements of section 431:19-102, to the following:

(1) The special purpose financial captive insurance
company shall submit its plan of operation to the commissioner for approval.
The plan of operation shall include:

(A) Draft documentation or, at the discretion
of the commissioner, a written summary, of all agreements and material
transactions, including but not limited to the name of the counterparty, the
nature of risk being assumed, and the nature and purpose of the
interrelationships between the various transactions that are entered into to
effectuate the special purpose financial captive insurance company contract and
the insurance securitization;

(B) The source and form of the special
purpose financial captive insurance company's initial and ongoing capital and
surplus;

(C) The proposed strategic investment policy
of the special purpose financial captive insurance company;

(D) A description of the underwriting,
reporting, and claims reserving and payment methods by which losses covered by
the special purpose financial captive insurance company are reported, accounted
for, and settled; and

(E) Projected financial statements of the
special purpose financial captive insurance company using an expected and at
least one adverse case scenario applied to the special purpose financial
captive insurance company contract;

(2) The special purpose financial captive insurance
company shall submit an affidavit of or a declaration by its president, a vice
president, the treasurer, or the chief financial officer, that includes the
following statements, to the best of that person's knowledge and belief after
reasonable inquiry:

(A) That the proposed organization and
operation of the special purpose financial captive insurance company complies
with all applicable provisions of this part;

(B) That the special purpose financial
captive insurance company's strategic investment policy reflects and takes into
account the liquidity of assets and the reasonable preservation,
administration, and management of the assets with respect to the risks
associated with the special purpose financial captive insurance company
contract and the insurance securitization transaction; and

(C) That the special purpose financial
captive insurance company contract and any arrangement for securing the special
purpose financial captive insurance company's obligations under the special
purpose financial captive insurance company contract, including but not limited
to any agreement or other documentation to implement the arrangement, comply
with the provisions of this part;

(3) The special purpose financial captive insurance
company shall submit other documents or statements of the special purpose
financial captive insurance company's officer as may be required by the
commissioner to evaluate the special purpose financial captive insurance company's
application for licensure; and

(4) The application shall include an opinion of
qualified legal counsel, in a form acceptable to the commissioner, that the
offer and sale of any special purpose financial captive insurance company
securities comply with all applicable registration requirements, or applicable
exemptions from or exceptions to the requirements of the federal securities
laws and that the offer and sale of securities by the special purpose financial
captive insurance company itself comply with all registration requirements or
applicable exemptions from or exceptions to the requirements of the security
laws of this State. The legal opinions shall not be required as part of the
application if the special purpose financial captive insurance company includes
a specific statement in its plan of operation that the opinions shall be
provided to the commissioner prior to the offer or sale of any special purpose
financial captive insurance company securities.

(d) The commissioner may issue a certificate
of authority to transact insurance and reinsurance business as a special
purpose financial captive insurance company in this State that shall be valid
through the term of the insurance securitization and automatically renewed each
April 1 following the date of initial issuance, except as provided for in
section 431:19-212, and upon the commissioner's finding that:

(1) The proposed plan of operation provides for a
reasonable and expected successful operation;

(2) The terms of the special purpose financial
captive insurance company contract and related transactions comply with this
part; and

(3) The insurance regulator of the home domicile of
each counterparty has notified the commissioner in writing or otherwise
provided assurance satisfactory to the commissioner that it has approved or has
not disapproved the transaction; provided that the commissioner shall not be
precluded from issuing or renewing a certificate of authority in the event that
the insurance regulator of the home domicile of a counterparty has not
responded with respect to all or any part of the transaction.

(e) Section 431:19-101.2 shall apply to all
information submitted pursuant to subsection (c) and to any order issued to the
special purpose financial captive insurance company pursuant to subsection (b).
[L 2008, c 190, pt of §1; am L 2009, c 11, §6]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next